Utah statutes.
77-3-4.   Warrant of arrest -- Temporary restraining order.

If the magistrate believes there is reasonable ground to fear the commission of the offense threatened, he may:

(1)  Issue a warrant directed generally to any peace officer, reciting the substance of the complaint and commanding the officer to immediately arrest the person complained of and bring him before the magistrate or in the case of his absence or inability to act before the nearest and most accessible magistrate of the county; and

(2)  Issue a temporary restraining order against the commission of the offense and order the person complained of to immediately appear before the magistrate for a hearing.



Enacted by Chapter 15, 1980 General Session

